District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3712

Injunctions; cease and desist orders.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-216, § 13, 40 DCR 37
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(b)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2642.

Prior Codifications